Indiana, session 2026, HB1227.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-8.1-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 3. Bullion Depositories
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "bullion" has the meaning set
forth in IC 26-2-11-1.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "bullion depository" means an
entity that provides at least one (1) vault facility within the United
States for the storage of bullion that:
(1) complies with the London Bullion Market Association best
practice guidelines or an equivalent set of guidelines; and
(2) provides bullion depository accounts that:
(A) hold bullion; and
(B) allow a bullion depository account holder to buy, sell,
save, or spend bullion.
2026 IN 1227—LS 6859/DI 154


Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "bullion depository account"
means an account established with a bullion depository to facilitate
the storage, transfer, and exchange of bullion.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "consumer" means:
(1) a natural person whose principal residence is in Indiana;
or
(2) a person, other than a natural person, that is domiciled in
Indiana.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "electronic payment system"
means an electronic system that enables participating vendors to
receive and process a payment from a bullion depository account
holder using specie held in the bullion depository as the payment
method for the transaction.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "person" means an individual, a
corporation, a partnership, a company, an association, a trust, an
estate, or a governmental entity.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "political subdivision" has the
meaning set forth in IC 36-1-2-13.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "precious metal" has the
meaning set forth in IC 26-2-11-3.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "security" means physical,
online, and logical security standards that meet generally accepted
standards within the information assurance industry.
Sec. 10. As used in this chapter, "specie" has the meaning set
forth in IC 26-2-11-5.
Sec. 11. The treasurer of state shall designate one (1) or more
established bullion depositories to provide a secure location for the
storage of bullion by consumers.
Sec. 12. Upon designating one (1) or more bullion depositories
under section 11 of this chapter, the treasurer of state shall engage
an electronic payment system to oversee transactional and
administrative procedures on behalf of consumers holding bullion
depository accounts in a designated bullion depository.
Sec. 13. (a) A consumer may establish a bullion depository
account with a bullion depository designated under this chapter by
entering into a depository agreement with the bullion depository.
(b) The holder of a bullion depository account established under
subsection (a) may purchase, sell, deposit, or withdraw bullion
through the holder's bullion depository account in accordance with
the terms of the holder's depository agreement with the bullion
depository.
Sec. 14. Notwithstanding any other law, including any law
2026 IN 1227—LS 6859/DI 154


regarding the requirements for designation as a public depository,
or any law regarding the location of a principal office or branch of
a public depository, a designated bullion depository is a depository
for purposes of IC 5-13-8 and IC 5-13-9.5 and is eligible to receive
public funds of:
(1) the state; or
(2) a political subdivision;
on deposit. The state or a political subdivision, or any agency or
instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision, may use a
designated bullion depository for storing bullion. The treasurer of
state may deposit a portion of state funds, in the form of bullion,
into a bullion depository account in a designated bullion
depository. A deposit made by the treasurer of state under this
section is considered part of the state treasury. The state board of
finance, under the authority set forth in IC 4-9.1-1-5, and in
consultation with the board for depositories created by
IC 5-13-12-1, shall adopt rules to implement this section.
Sec. 15. (a) The treasurer of state shall ensure that each bullion
depository designated under this chapter is audited by an
independent third party auditor not later than thirty (30) days
after the end of each state fiscal year. An audit performed under
this section must:
(1) verify the amount and value of bullion stored at each
physical location of the bullion depository; and
(2) inspect and evaluate the security measures in place at the
bullion depository.
(b) A third party auditor that performs an audit under this
section must be an established provider of auditing services with
credentials specified by the treasurer of state in guidelines adopted
under section 18 of this chapter.
(c) A third party auditor that performs an audit under this
section shall prepare and submit to the treasurer of state a report
of the audit, in the form and manner prescribed by the treasurer
of state in guidelines adopted under section 18 of this chapter. A
report under this subsection must document, at a minimum:
(1) a total of the assessed amounts of precious metals on
deposit with the designated bullion depository; and
(2) any discrepancies between:
(A) the records maintained by the bullion depository; and
(B) the findings of the third party auditor;
with respect to any aspect of the operations of, or the security
measures in place at, the bullion depository.
2026 IN 1227—LS 6859/DI 154


An audit report prepared under this subsection is a public record
that is open to inspection and copying under IC 5-14-3-3. However,
the third party auditor that prepares the report shall not include
in the report any information that identifies a holder of a bullion
depository account with the designated bullion depository, other
than with respect to a bullion depository account held by the state
or a political subdivision.
Sec. 16. Not later than November 1 of each year, the treasurer
of state shall submit to the executive director of the legislative
services agency for distribution to the members of the general
assembly a report concerning the operations and financial status
of each bullion depository designated under this chapter. The
report submitted to the executive director of the legislative services
agency under this section must be in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 17. (a) Subject to subsection (b), the treasurer of state has
all powers necessary and appropriate to implement and administer
this chapter, including the power to make and execute contracts
with public or private entities.
(b) A contract described in subsection (a) is subject to review by
the budget committee.
Sec. 18. (a) The treasurer of state, in consultation with the
department of financial institutions, shall adopt guidelines for the
implementation and administration of the provisions of this
chapter.
(b) The treasurer of state shall adopt guidelines under this
section, designate one (1) or more bullion depositories under
section 11 of this chapter, and engage an electronic payment
system under section 12 of this chapter not later than December 31,
2027.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.234-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) As used in this section, "nonbusiness
personal property" means personal property that is not:
(1) held for sale in the ordinary course of a trade or business;
(2) held, used, or consumed in connection with the production of
income; or
(3) held as an investment.
(b) The following property is not subject to assessment and taxation
under this article:
(1) A commercial vessel that is subject to the net tonnage tax
imposed under IC 6-6-6.
2026 IN 1227—LS 6859/DI 154


(2) A vehicle that is subject to the vehicle excise tax imposed
under IC 6-6-5.
(3) A motorized boat or sailboat that is subject to the boat excise
tax imposed under IC 6-6-11.
(4) Property used by a cemetery (as defined in IC 23-14-33-7) if
the cemetery:
(A) does not have a board of directors, board of trustees, or
other governing authority other than the state or a political
subdivision; and
(B) has had no business transaction during the preceding
calendar year.
(5) A commercial vehicle that is subject to the annual excise tax
imposed under IC 6-6-5.5.
(6) Inventory.
(7) A recreational vehicle or truck camper that is subject to the
annual excise tax imposed under IC 6-6-5.1.
(8) The following types of nonbusiness personal property:
(A) All-terrain vehicles.
(B) Snowmobiles.
(C) Rowboats, canoes, kayaks, and other human powered
boats.
(D) Invalid chairs.
(E) Yard and garden tractors.
(F) Trailers that are not subject to an excise tax under:
(i) IC 6-6-5;
(ii) IC 6-6-5.1; or
(iii) IC 6-6-5.5.
(9) For an assessment date after December 31, 2018, heavy rental
equipment (as defined in IC 6-6-15-2) that is rented or held for
rental or sale, the rental of which is or would be subject to the
heavy equipment rental excise tax provisions under IC 6-6-15;
provided, however, that a rentee that is exempt under
IC 6-6-15-4(a)(3) from such excise tax shall be subject to the
provisions of this article on such equipment.
(10) For an assessment date after December 31, 2026, bullion
(as defined in IC 26-2-11-1).
SECTION 3. IC 6-2.5-5-47, AS AMENDED BY P.L.239-2017,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 47. (a) As used in this section, "legal tender"
has the meaning set forth in IC 26-2-11-2.
(b) Transactions involving the sale of or the lease or rental of
storage for:
2026 IN 1227—LS 6859/DI 154


(1) coins that are permitted investments by an individual
retirement account or by an individually-directed account under
26 U.S.C. 408(m);
(2) bullion that would be a permitted investment by an individual
retirement account or by an individually-directed account under
26 U.S.C. 408(m) if the bullion was in the physical possession of
a trustee; (as defined in IC 26-2-11-1); or
(3) legal tender;
are exempt from the state gross retail tax.
(c) The exchange of one (1) type or form of legal tender for
another type or form of legal tender is exempt from the state gross
retail tax.
(d) The purchase, sale, or exchange of any type of specie (as
defined in IC 26-2-11-5) is exempt from the state gross retail tax.
SECTION 4. IC 26-2-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Gold and Silver as Legal Tender
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "bullion" means refined
precious metal, in any shape or form (including coins, rounds, bars,
ingots, or other products) that is valued primarily based on its
metal content and not on its form and function.
(b) The term includes a precious metal coin.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "legal tender" means a
recognized medium of exchange for the payment of debts, taxes,
fees, or any other obligation.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "precious metal" means gold or
silver.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "precious metal coin" means
precious metal that is:
(1) in bars or any other physical form that is certified for:
(A) gold metal, ninety-nine and one-half percent (99.5%)
pure; or
(B) silver metal, ninety-nine and nine-tenths percent
(99.9%) pure; and
(2) coined, stamped, or imprinted with the weight and purity
of the precious metal.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "specie" means bullion that is
fabricated into products that are:
(1) of uniform shape, size, design, content, weight, and purity;
and
(2) suitable for, or customarily used as:
2026 IN 1227—LS 6859/DI 154


(A) currency;
(B) a medium of exchange; or
(C) the medium for the purchase, sale, storage, transfer, or
delivery of precious metals in retail or wholesale
transactions.
Sec. 6. (a) Specie is recognized as legal tender in Indiana.
(b) Specie may be recognized to pay:
(1) private debts;
(2) taxes; and
(3) fees levied by the state or a political subdivision (as defined
in IC 36-1-2-13).
Sec. 7. (a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or
contract, a person may not compel any other person to:
(1) tender specie; or
(2) accept specie;
as legal tender.
(b) In addition to any other available remedies, a prevailing
party in an action for breach of any contract provision that
expressly designates a type or form of specie as legal tender is
entitled to specific performance of the contract provision.
2026 IN 1227—LS 6859/DI 154